Colorado statutes. TITLE 23 Postsecondary Education
ARTICLE 31
COLORADO STATE UNIVERSITY

Editor's note:

This article was numbered as article 10 of chapter 124, C.R.S. 1963. The provisions of this article were amended with relocations in 2007, resulting in the addition, relocation, and elimination of sections as well as subject matter. For amendments to this article prior to 2007, consult the Colorado statutory research explanatory note and the table itemizing the replacement volumes and supplements to the original volume of C.R.S. 1973 beginning on page vii in the front of this volume. Former C.R.S. section numbers are shown in editor's notes following those sections that were relocated. For a detailed comparison of this article, see the comparative tables located in the back of the index.

Section

PART 1 GENERAL PROVISIONS

PART 2 FORESTRY

PART 3 STATE FOREST SERVICE

PART 4 FOREST PRODUCTS

PART 5 COOPERATION WITH THE
UNITED STATES

PART 6 EXPERIMENT STATIONS

PART 7 COLORADO COOPERATIVE
EXTENSION SERVICE

PART 8 COLORADO WATER INSTITUTE

PART 9 FINANCING OF NATIONAL WESTERN
CENTER FACILITIES

PART 10 VETERINARY EDUCATION LOAN
REPAYMENT PROGRAM

PART 11 COLORADO FOOD SYSTEMS ADVISORY COUNCIL